Louisiana, session 2026, SB40.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:125 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§125. Procedure on approach of an authorized emergency vehicle; passing a parked
or disabled, emergency or nonemergency vehicle
A.(1) Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle, as
defined by R.S. 32:1, making use of audible or visual signals, authorized by law,
including the display of alternately flashing green, amber, blue, red, or yellow
warning lights, or of a police vehicle properly and lawfully making use of an
audible signal only, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and
shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-
hand edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection, and shall stop and remain
in such position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when
otherwise directed by a police officer.
(2) This Section shall not be construed to relieve the driver of an
authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the
safety of all persons using the highway.
B. When any vehicle making use of any visual signals as authorized by law,
including the display of alternately flashing green, amber, or yellow warning lights,
as defined by R.S. 32:1, is parked on or near the highway, disabled, immobilized,
nonoperational and is making use of any visual signals including the display of
flashing lights, hazard lamps, or any emergency warning devices, the driver of
every other passing or approaching vehicle shall:
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 40 ENROLLED
(1) When driving on an interstate highway or other highway with two or
more lanes traveling in the same direction, yield the right-of-way when driving on
an interstate highway or other highway with two or more lanes traveling in the
same direction, by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the parked
vehicle, if possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions. If a lane change
is not possible, unsafe, or driving on a two-lane road or highway, the driver shall
slow to a reasonably safe speed and maintain a safe speed for road conditions.
(2) Maintain a safe speed for road conditions, if unable or unsafe to change
lanes, or driving on a two-lane road or highway.
C. This Section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized
emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all
persons using the highway.
D. Any person who violates the provisions of this Section shall, upon
conviction, be subject to a fine not to exceed two hundred dollars.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.